California statutes. Business and Professions Code
(3) Any law school that
 is not approved by the American Bar Association shall include the standardized information report as part of the annual compliance report required to be submitted to the State Bar by all law schools that are not approved by the American Bar Association and are regulated by the examining committee of the State Bar.

(4) A law school may use the information report template to comply with the information disclosure required under subdivision (a).

(c) Any law school that is not approved by the American Bar Association shall publicly disclose on its Internet Web site, in a readable and comprehensive manner, all of the following information on a current basis:

(1) Refund policy.

(2) Curricular offerings, academic calendar, and academic requirements.

(3) Policy regarding the transfer of credit earned at another institution of higher education.

(d) The law school’s transfer of credit policy shall include, at a minimum, both of the following:

(1) A statement of the criteria established by the law school regarding the acceptance of credit earned for coursework completed at another institution.

(2) A list of institutions, if any, with which the law
 school has established an articulation agreement and the terms of any such agreement. If the law school has not entered into a transfer or articulation agreement with any other college or university, the institution shall disclose that fact.

(e) All information that a law school reports, publicizes, or distributes pursuant to this section shall be complete, accurate, and not misleading to a reasonable law school student or applicant. A law school shall use due diligence in obtaining and verifying such information.

(f) A law school that is not approved by the American Bar Association shall distribute the data required under paragraph (3) of subdivision (a) to all applicants being offered conditional scholarships at the time the scholarship offer is made.

(g) For the purposes of this section, the following definitions apply:

(1) “Admissions data” means information from the most recently enrolled fall semester class including the total number of applications, the total number of accepted students, and the 75th, 50th, and 25th percentile scores for the undergraduate grade point averages and law school admission test scores of admitted students.

(2) “Bar passage data” means the most current cumulative bar pass rates defined and reported by the examining committee of the State Bar.

(3) “Conditional scholarship” means any financial aid award, the retention of which is dependent upon the student maintaining a
 minimum grade point average or class standing other than that ordinarily required to remain in good academic standing. 

(4) “Curricular offering” means only those courses offered in the current and past two academic years.

(5) “Employment outcomes for graduates” means the results of a survey by the law school, taken three years after graduation, that breaks down the employment rate of graduates in each of the first three years after graduation, including the rate of employment of graduates in jobs where a Juris Doctor degree is required by the employer and the rate of employment of graduates in jobs where a Juris Doctor degree is an advantage in employment.

(6) “Enrollment data” means information about the number of students
 who are admitted to the school per class per year for the past three years, the number of students who transfer to and from the school per class per year for the past three years, and the number of students who do not continue to attend the school each year for the past three years on either a voluntary or involuntary basis.

(7) “Transfer or articulation agreement” means an agreement between the law school and any other college or university that provides for the transfer of credits earned in the program of instruction.

(History: Added by Stats. 2016, Ch. 87, Sec. 1.   (SB 1281)   Effective January 1, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------

6062.

(a) To be certified to the Supreme Court for admission, and a license to practice law, a person who has been admitted to practice law in a sister state, United States jurisdiction, possession, territory, or dependency the United States may hereafter acquire shall:

(1) Be of the age of at least 18 years.

(2) Be of good moral character.

(3) Have passed the general bar examination given by the examining committee. However, if that person has been an active licensee in good standing of the bar of the admitting sister state or United States jurisdiction, possession, or territory for at least four years
 immediately preceding the first day of the examination applied for, he or she may elect to take the Attorneys’ Examination rather than the general bar examination. Attorneys admitted less than four years and attorneys admitted four years or more in another jurisdiction but who have not been active licensees in good standing of their admitting jurisdiction for at least four years immediately preceding the first day of the examination applied for must take the general bar examination administered to general applicants not admitted as attorneys in other jurisdictions.

(4) Have passed an examination in professional responsibility or legal ethics as the examining committee may prescribe.

(b) To be certified to the Supreme Court for admission, and a license to practice law, a person who has been admitted to practice law in a jurisdiction other than in a sister state, United States
 jurisdiction, possession, or territory shall:

(1) Be of the age of at least 18 years.

(2) Be of good moral character.

(3) Have passed the general bar examination given by the examining committee.

(4) Have passed an examination in professional responsibility or legal ethics as the examining committee may prescribe.

(c) The amendments to this section made at the 1997–98 Regular Session of the Legislature shall be applicable on and after January 1, 1997, and do not constitute a change in, but are declaratory of, existing law.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2018, Ch. 659, Sec. 49.   (AB 3249)   Effective January 1, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------

6063.

Applicants for admission to practice shall pay such reasonable fees, fixed by the board, as may be necessary to defray the expense of administering the provisions of this chapter, relating to admission to practice. These fees shall be collected by the State Bar and paid into the treasury of the State Bar.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2023, Ch. 697, Sec. 15.   (SB 40)   Effective January 1, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

6064.

(a) Upon certification by the examining committee that the applicant has fulfilled the requirements for admission to practice law, the Supreme Court may admit the applicant as an attorney at law in all the courts of this state and may direct an order to be entered upon its records to that
 effect. A certificate of admission thereupon shall be given to the applicant by the clerk of the court.

(b) Upon certification by the examining committee that an applicant who is not lawfully present in the United States has fulfilled the requirements for admission to practice law, the Supreme Court may admit that applicant as an attorney at law in all the courts of this state and may direct an order to be entered upon its records to that effect. A certificate of admission thereupon shall be given to the applicant by the clerk of the court.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2013, Ch. 573, Sec. 1.   (AB 1024)   Effective January 1, 2014.)
-------------------------------------------

6064.1.

No person who advocates the overthrow of the Government of the United States or of this State by force, violence, or other unconstitutional means, shall be certified to the Supreme Court for admission and a license to practice law.

(History: Added by Stats. 1951, Ch. 179.)
-------------------------------------------

6065.

Any applicant for admission to practice who did not pass the California bar examination, for 30 days following the release of examination results, shall have electronic access to their answers to the written sessions of the bar examination, which shall include the ability to download, save, and print.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2023, Ch. 697, Sec. 16.   (SB 40)   Effective January 1, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

6066.

Any person refused certification to the Supreme Court for admission to practice may have the action of the board, or of any committee authorized by the board to make a determination on its behalf, pursuant to the provisions of this chapter, reviewed by the Supreme Court, in accordance with the procedure prescribed by the court.

(History: Added by Stats. 1939, Ch. 34.)
-------------------------------------------

6067.

Every person on his admission shall take an oath to support the Constitution of the United States and the Constitution of the State of California, and faithfully to discharge the duties of any attorney at law to the best of his knowledge and ability. A certificate of the oath shall be indorsed upon his license.

(History: Added by Stats. 1939, Ch. 34.)
-------------------------------------------

6068.

It is the duty of an attorney to do all of the following:

(a) To support the Constitution and laws of the United States and of this state.

(b) To maintain the respect due to the courts of justice and judicial officers.

(c) To counsel or maintain those actions, proceedings, or defenses only as appear to him or her legal or just, except the defense of a person charged with a public offense.

(d) To employ, for the purpose of maintaining the causes confided to him or her those means only as are consistent with truth, and never to seek to mislead the judge or
 any judicial officer by an artifice or false statement of fact or law.

(e) (1) To maintain inviolate the confidence, and at every peril to himself or herself to preserve the secrets, of his or her client.

(2) Notwithstanding paragraph (1), an attorney may, but is not required to, reveal confidential information relating to the representation of a client to the extent that the attorney reasonably believes the disclosure is necessary to prevent a criminal act that the attorney reasonably believes is likely to result in death of, or substantial bodily harm to, an individual.

(f) To advance no fact prejudicial to the honor or reputation of a party or witness, unless required by the justice of the cause with which he or she is charged.

(g) Not to encourage either the commencement or the continuance of an action or proceeding from any corrupt motive of passion or interest.

(h) Never to reject, for any consideration personal to himself or herself, the cause of the defenseless or the oppressed.

(i) To cooperate and participate in any disciplinary investigation or other regulatory or disciplinary proceeding pending against himself or herself. However, this subdivision shall not be construed to deprive an attorney of any privilege guaranteed by the Fifth Amendment to the Constitution of the United States, or any other constitutional or statutory privileges. This subdivision shall not be construed to require an attorney to cooperate with a request that requires him or her to waive any constitutional or statutory privilege or to comply with a request for information or other matters within an unreasonable
 period of time in light of the time constraints of the attorney’s practice. Any exercise by an attorney of any constitutional or statutory privilege shall not be used against the attorney in a regulatory or disciplinary proceeding against him or her.

(j) To comply with the requirements of Section 6002.1.

(k) To comply with all conditions attached to any disciplinary probation, including a probation imposed with the concurrence of the attorney.

(l) To keep all agreements made in lieu of disciplinary prosecution with the State Bar.

(m) To respond promptly to reasonable status inquiries of clients and to keep clients reasonably informed of significant developments in matters with regard to which the attorney has agreed to provide legal services.

(n) To provide copies to the client of certain documents under time limits and as prescribed in a rule of professional conduct which the board shall adopt.

(o) To report to the State Bar, in writing, within 30 days of the time the attorney has knowledge of any of the following:

(1) The filing of three or more lawsuits in a 12-month period against the attorney for malpractice or other wrongful conduct committed in a professional capacity.

(2) The entry of judgment against the attorney in a civil action for fraud, misrepresentation, breach of fiduciary duty, or gross negligence committed in a professional capacity.

(3) The imposition of judicial sanctions against the attorney, except for
 sanctions for failure to make discovery or monetary sanctions of less than one thousand dollars ($1,000).

(4) The bringing of an indictment or information charging a felony against the attorney.

(5) The conviction of the attorney, including any verdict of guilty, or plea of guilty or no contest, of a felony, or a misdemeanor committed in the course of the practice of law, or in a manner in which a client of the attorney was the victim, or a necessary element of which, as determined by the statutory or common law definition of the misdemeanor, involves improper conduct of an attorney, including dishonesty or other moral turpitude, or an attempt or a conspiracy or solicitation of another to commit a felony or a misdemeanor of that type.

(6) The imposition of discipline against the attorney by a professional or
 occupational disciplinary agency or licensing board, whether in California or elsewhere.

(7) Reversal of judgment in a proceeding based in whole or in part upon misconduct, grossly incompetent representation, or willful misrepresentation by an attorney.

(8) As used in this subdivision, “against the attorney” includes claims and proceedings against any firm of attorneys for the practice of law in which the attorney was a partner at the time of the conduct complained of and any law corporation in which the attorney was a shareholder at the time of the conduct complained of unless the matter has to the attorney’s knowledge already been reported by the law firm or corporation.

(9) The State Bar may develop a prescribed form for the making of reports required by this section, usage of which it may require by rule or
 regulation.

(10) This subdivision is only intended to provide that the failure to report as required herein may serve as a basis of discipline.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2018, Ch. 659, Sec. 50.   (AB 3249)   Effective January 1, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------

6069.

(a) Every licensee of the State Bar shall be deemed by operation of this law to have irrevocably authorized the disclosure to the State Bar and the Supreme Court pursuant to Section 7473 of the Government Code of any and all financial records held by financial institutions as defined in subdivisions (a) and (b) of Section 7465 of the Government Code pertaining to accounts which the licensee must maintain in accordance with the Rules of Professional Conduct; provided that no such financial records shall be disclosed to the State Bar without a subpoena therefor having been issued pursuant to Section 6049 of this code, and further provided that the board of trustees shall by rule provide notice to the licensee similar to that notice provided for in subdivision (d) of Section 7473 of the Government Code. Such notice may be sent by
 mail addressed to the licensee’s current office or other address for State Bar purposes as shown on the licensee’s registration records of the State Bar.

The State Bar shall, by mail addressed to the licensee’s current office or other address for State Bar purposes as shown on the licensee’s registration records of the State Bar, notify its licensees annually of the provisions of this subdivision.

(b) With regard to the examination of all financial records other than those mentioned in subdivision (a), held by financial institutions as defined in subdivisions (a) and (b) of Section 7465 of the Government Code, no such financial records shall be disclosed to the State Bar without a subpoena therefor having been issued pursuant to Section 6049 of this code and the board of trustees shall by rule provide for service of a copy of the subpoena on the customer as defined in subdivision (d) of Section 7465 of
 the Government Code and an opportunity for the customer to move the board or committee having jurisdiction to quash the subpoena prior to examination of the financial records. Review of the actions of the board or any committee on such motions shall be had only by the Supreme Court in accordance with the procedure prescribed by the court. Service of a copy of any subpoena issued pursuant to this subdivision (b) may be made on a licensee of the State Bar by mail addressed to the licensee’s current office or other address for State Bar purposes as shown on the licensee’s registration records of the State Bar. If the customer is other than a licensee, service shall be made pursuant to Chapter 4 (commencing with Section 413.10) of Title 5 of Part 2 of the Code of Civil Procedure, except that service may be made by an employee of the State Bar.

(c) For purposes of this section, “licensee of the State Bar” or “licensee” means every licensee of the
 State Bar, law firm in California of which a licensee of the State Bar is a licensee, and law corporation within the meaning of Article 10 of Chapter 4 of Division 3 of this code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2018, Ch. 659, Sec. 51.   (AB 3249)   Effective January 1, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 4.5. Mandatory Continuing Legal Education [6070. - 6071.]

6070.

(a) The State Bar shall request the California Supreme Court to adopt a rule of court authorizing the State Bar to establish and administer a mandatory continuing legal education program. The rule that the State Bar requests the Supreme Court to adopt shall require that, within designated 36-month periods, all active licensees of the State Bar shall complete at least 25 hours of legal education activities approved by the State Bar or offered by a State Bar-approved provider, with four of those hours in legal ethics. The legal education activities shall focus on California law and practice and federal law as relevant to its practice in California or tribal law. A licensee of the State Bar who fails to satisfy the mandatory continuing legal education requirements of the program authorized by the Supreme Court rule shall be enrolled
 as an inactive licensee pursuant to rules adopted by the Board of Trustees of the State Bar.

(b) For purposes of this section, statewide associations of public agencies and incorporated, nonprofit professional associations of attorneys, including the California Lawyers Association, shall be certified as State Bar approved providers upon completion of an appropriate application process to be established by the State Bar. The certification may be revoked only by majority vote of the board, after notice and hearing, and for good cause shown. Programs provided by the California District Attorneys Association or the California Public Defenders Association, or both, including, but not limited to, programs provided pursuant to Title 1.5 (commencing with Section 11500) of Part 4 of the Penal Code, are deemed to be legal education activities approved by the State Bar or offered by a State Bar-approved provider.

(c) Notwithstanding the provisions of subdivision (a), officers and elected officials of the State of California, and full-time professors at law schools accredited by the State Bar of California, the American Bar Association, or both, shall be exempt from the provisions of this section. Full-time employees of the State of California, acting within the scope of their employment, shall be exempt from the provisions of this section. Nothing in this section shall prohibit the State of California, or any political subdivision thereof, from establishing or maintaining its own continuing education requirements for its employees.

(d) The California Lawyers Association shall provide and encourage the development of low-cost programs and materials by which licensees of the State Bar may satisfy their continuing education requirements. Special emphasis shall be placed upon the use of internet
 capabilities and computer technology in the development and provision of no-cost and low-cost programs and materials. Towards this purpose, as a condition of the State Bar’s collection of membership fees on behalf of the California Lawyers Association pursuant to subdivision (b) of Section 6031.5, the California Lawyers Association shall ensure that any licensee possessing or having access to the Internet or specified generally available computer technology shall be capable of satisfying the full self-study portion of his or her MCLE requirement at a cost of twenty dollars ($20) per hour or less.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2018, Ch. 659, Sec. 52.   (AB 3249)   Effective January 1, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------

6070.1.

(a) For the purpose of subdivision (c) of Section 6070, “full-time employees of the State of California” shall include all licensees of the State Bar employed by the California State Legislature, regardless of the licensee’s official position classification.

(b) This section is declaratory of existing law.

(History: Added by Stats. 2024, Ch. 227, Sec. 12.   (AB 3279)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

6070.5.

(a) The State Bar shall adopt regulations to require, as of January 1, 2022, that the mandatory continuing legal education (MCLE) curriculum for all licensees under this chapter includes training on implicit bias and the promotion of bias-reducing strategies to address how unintended biases regarding race, ethnicity, gender identity, sexual orientation, socioeconomic status, or other characteristics undermine confidence in the legal system. A licensee shall meet the requirements of this section for each MCLE compliance period ending after January 31, 2022.

(b) When approving MCLE providers to offer the training required by subdivision (a), the State Bar shall require that the MCLE
 provider meets, at a minimum, all of the following requirements:

(1) The MCLE provider shall make reasonable efforts to recruit and hire trainers who are representative of the diversity of persons that California’s legal system serves.

(2) The trainers shall have either academic training in implicit bias or experience educating legal professionals about implicit bias and its effects on people accessing and interacting with the legal system.

(3) The training shall include a component regarding the impact of implicit bias, explicit bias, and systemic bias on the legal system and the effect this can have on people accessing and interacting with the legal system.

(4) The training shall include actionable steps licensees can take to recognize and address their own implicit biases.

(c) As part of the certification, approval, or renewal process for MCLE-approved provider status, or more frequently if required by the State Bar, the MCLE provider shall attest to its compliance with the requirements of subdivision (b) and shall confirm that it will continue to comply with those requirements for the duration of the provider’s approval period.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2020, Ch. 36, Sec. 1.   (AB 3364)   Effective January 1, 2021.)
-------------------------------------------

6071.

(a) The State Bar shall request the California Supreme Court to amend Rule 9.31 of the California Rules of Court, relating to the mandatory continuing education program, to provide that one hour of the mandatory eight hours of legal education activities in legal ethics or law practice management, instead, may be satisfied by one hour of legal education activity in the civil and criminal remedies available for civil rights violations.

(b) This section shall not affect the requirement that all active licensees of the State Bar complete at least four hours of legal education activity in ethics within designated 36-month periods.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2018, Ch. 659, Sec. 53.   (AB 3249)   Effective January 1, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 4.7. Contracts For Legal Services [6072. - 6072.]

6072.

(a) A contract with the state for legal services that exceeds fifty thousand dollars ($50,000) shall include a certification by the contracting law firm that the firm agrees to make a good faith effort to provide, during the duration of the contract, a minimum number of hours of pro bono legal services, or an equivalent amount of financial contributions to qualified legal services projects and support centers, as defined in Section 6213, during each year of the contract equal to the lesser of either (1) 30 multiplied by the number of full-time attorneys in the firm’s offices in the state, with the number of hours prorated on an actual day basis for any contract period of less than
 a full year or (2) 10 percent of its contract with the state. “Ten percent of the contract” shall mean the number of hours equal to 10 percent of the contract amount divided by the average billing rate of the firm.

(b) Failure to make a good faith effort may be cause for nonrenewal of a state contract for legal services, and may be taken into account when determining the award of future contracts with the state for legal services. If a firm fails to provide the hours of pro bono legal services set forth in its certification, the following factors shall be considered in determining whether the firm made a good faith effort:

(1) The actual number of hours of pro bono legal services or the amount of financial contributions provided by the firm during the term of the
 contract.

(2) The firm’s efforts to obtain pro bono legal work from legal services programs, pro bono programs, and other relevant communities or groups.

(3) The firm’s history of providing pro bono legal services or financial contributions, or other activities of the firm that evidence a good faith effort to provide pro bono legal services or financial contributions, such as the adoption of a pro bono policy or the creation of a pro bono committee.

(4) The types of pro bono legal services provided, including the quantity and complexity of cases as well as the nature of the relief sought.

(5) The extent to which the failure to provide the hours of pro bono legal services or financial contributions set forth in the certification is the result of extenuating circumstances unforeseen at the time of the certification.

(c) In awarding a contract with the state for legal services that exceeds fifty thousand dollars ($50,000), the awarding department shall consider the efforts of a potential contracting law firm to provide, during the 12-month period prior to award of the contract, the minimum number of hours of pro bono legal services described in subdivision (a). Other things being equal, the awarding department shall award a contract for legal services to firms that have provided, during the 12-month period prior to award of the contract, the minimum number of hours
 of pro bono legal services described in subdivision (a).

(d) As used in this section, “pro bono legal services” means the provision of legal services either:

(1) Without fee or expectation of fee to either:

(A) Persons who are indigent or of limited means.

(B) Charitable, religious, civic, community, governmental, and educational organizations in matters designed primarily to address the economic, health, and social needs of persons who are indigent or of limited means.

(2) At no fee or substantially reduced fee to groups or organizations seeking to secure or protect civil rights, civil liberties, or public rights.

(e) Nothing in this section shall subject a contracting law firm that fails to provide the minimum number of hours of pro bono legal services described in subdivision (a) to civil or criminal liability, nor shall that failure be grounds for invalidating an existing contract for legal services.

(f) This article shall not apply to state contracts with, or appointments made by the judiciary of, an attorney, law firm, or organization for the purposes of providing legal representation to low- or middle-income persons, in either civil, criminal, or administrative matters.

(g) This article shall not apply to contracts entered into between the state and an attorney or law firm if the legal services contracted for are to be performed outside the State of California.

(h) The provisions of this article shall become
 operative on January 1, 2003.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2012, Ch. 758, Sec. 1.   (AB 2684)   Effective January 1, 2013.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 4.8. Pro Bono Services [6073. - 6074.]

6073.

It has been the tradition of those learned in the law and licensed to practice law in this state to provide voluntary pro bono legal services to those who cannot afford the help of a lawyer. Every lawyer authorized and privileged to practice law in California is expected to make a contribution. In some circumstances, it may not be feasible for a lawyer to directly provide pro bono services. In those circumstances, a lawyer may instead fulfill his or her individual pro bono ethical commitment, in part, by providing financial support to organizations providing free legal services to persons of limited means. In deciding to provide that financial support, the lawyer should, at minimum, approximate the value of the hours of pro bono legal service that he or she would otherwise have provided. In some circumstances, pro bono contributions may be measured collectively, as by a firm’s aggregate pro bono activities or financial contributions. Lawyers also make invaluable contributions through their other voluntary public service activities that increase access to justice or improve the law and the legal system. In view of their expertise in areas that critically affect the lives and well-being of members of the public, lawyers are uniquely situated to provide invaluable assistance in order to benefit those who might otherwise be unable to assert or protect their interests, and to support those legal organizations that advance these goals.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2008, Ch. 179, Sec. 14.   Effective January 1, 2009.)
-------------------------------------------

6073.1.

For purposes of this article, the following definitions apply:

(a) “Legal aid organization” has the meaning provided in Section 6159.51.

(b) “Person of limited means” means an individual qualified as “low-income,” “very low income,” or “extremely low income” under the current Department of Housing and Community Development’s Official State Income Limits as set forth on the State of California’s internet website.

(c) (1) “Pro bono legal services” means providing or enabling the direct delivery of legal services without expectation of compensation from the client other than reimbursement of expenses to any of the
 following:

(A) An indigent person, as defined in subdivision (d) of Section 6213.

(B) A charitable, religious, civic, community, governmental, or educational organization in matters that are designed primarily to address the needs of persons of limited means.

(C) A charitable, religious, civic, community, governmental, or educational organization in matters in furtherance of its organizational purposes.

(2) “Pro bono legal services” does not include legal services written off as bad debts.

(d) “Reduced fee legal services” means providing or enabling direct delivery of legal services at a substantially reduced rate affordable to persons of limited means to either:

(1) A person of limited means.

(2) A person or organization identified in subparagraph (A), (B), or (C) of paragraph (1) of subdivision (c).

(History: Added by Stats. 2024, Ch. 719, Sec. 1.   (AB 2505)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

6073.2.

(a) Pursuant to Section 6073, every lawyer should aspire to fulfill their individual commitment to provide pro bono legal services each year and contribute financially to California legal aid organizations.

(b) An active licensee shall report whether they have provided pro bono legal services through the licensee’s My State Bar online profile on the State Bar’s internet website through a provided section where those hours shall be declared when payment of annual fees is due. Every licensee shall report both of the following:

(1) Amount of pro bono legal services hours performed during the calendar year preceding the year in which the annual fee is due.

(2) Hours of reduced fee legal services performed for a low-income individual, nonprofit organization, or public law library established under Section 6360 during the calendar year preceding the date the annual report is due.

(c) The State Bar may include, as part of the reporting requirement under subdivision (b), options for active licensees who do not track their pro bono hours or reduced fee legal services hours or who decline to answer, to indicate that status when prompted to report.

(d) The reporting requirement in subdivision (b) does not apply if a licensee is any of the following:

(1) Is employed by an organization primarily engaged in the provision of pro bono legal services, including qualified legal services projects and qualified support
 centers, as defined in Section 6213, legal aid organizations, and nonprofit public benefit corporations, as authorized by Section 13406 of the Corporations Code.

(2) A full-time employee or an officer or elected official of the State of California, or political subdivision thereof, or the federal government.

(3) Is prohibited by their current employer from performing pro bono legal services if the licensee declares this prohibition on their My State Bar online profile on the State Bar’s internet website through a provided section when payment of annual fees is due.

(e) The State Bar shall retain and maintain the information reported pursuant to subdivision (b) for purposes of historical record for at least five years.

(f) (1) The
 information reported pursuant to subdivision (b) shall be confidential and shall not be disclosed as a public record pursuant to the California Public Records Act (Division 10 (commencing with Section 7920.000) of Title 1 of the Government Code).

(2) Notwithstanding paragraph (1), the State Bar may publish aggregated and anonymized reports based on the information received pursuant to subdivision (b).

(g) Failure of a licensee of the State Bar to comply with any of the provisions of this section is not grounds for disciplinary or administrative recourse.

(h) The State Bar shall not use any moneys received from the annual license fees collected pursuant to Section 6140 or 6141 for any costs associated with this section.

(History: Added by Stats. 2024, Ch. 719, Sec. 2.   (AB 2505)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

6074.

(a) The Legislature finds that securing civil legal assistance is difficult for veterans, service members, and their families who cannot afford legal services, for reasons unique to their military or veteran status. The Legislature further finds that the State Bar is uniquely suited to bring together organizations to help coordinate the delivery of civil legal services for veterans and service members and their
 families.

(b) The State Bar shall engage with local bar associations, legal aid organizations, veterans service providers, military service providers, and volunteer attorneys and encourage those groups to provide legal services to veterans and service members and their families who otherwise cannot afford legal services and collaborate, as appropriate, to improve access to and delivery of these services throughout the state.

(c) The State Bar shall provide resources and educational materials to attorneys and the public in order to support the purposes of this section by, among other things, doing the following:

(1) Compiling a list of local bar associations, legal aid organizations, veterans
 service providers, military service providers, and volunteer attorneys willing to provide pro bono legal services to veterans and service members, organized by city and county, and posting the list on its internet website.

(2) Conducting a statewide survey of programs that provide civil legal assistance to veterans in order to identify whether and where there is a need for legal advice clinics, publishing a report and recommendations based upon its findings no later than December 31, 2018, and posting the report on its internet website.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2019, Ch. 303, Sec. 1.   (AB 558)   Effective January 1, 2020.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 5. Disciplinary Authority of the Board of Governors [6075. - 6088.]

6075.

In their relation to the provisions of Article 6, concerning the disciplinary authority of the courts, the provisions of this article provide a complete alternative and cumulative method of hearing and determining accusations against licensees of the State Bar.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2018, Ch. 659, Sec. 54.   (AB 3249)   Effective January 1, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------

6076.

With the approval of the Supreme Court, the Board of Trustees may formulate and enforce rules of professional conduct for all licensees of the State Bar.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2018, Ch. 659, Sec. 55.   (AB 3249)   Effective January 1, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------

6077.

The rules of professional conduct adopted by the board, when approved by the Supreme Court, are binding upon all licensees of the State Bar.

For a willful breach of any of these rules, the State Bar Court has power to discipline attorneys by reproval, public or private, or to recommend to the Supreme Court the suspension from practice for a period not exceeding three years of licensees of the State Bar.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2019, Ch. 698, Sec. 9.   (SB 176)   Effective January 1, 2020.)
-------------------------------------------

6077.5.

An attorney and his or her employees who are employed primarily to assist in the collection of a consumer debt owed to another, as defined by Section 1788.2 of the Civil Code, shall comply with all of the following:

(a) The obligations imposed on debt collectors pursuant to Article 2 (commencing with Section 1788.10) of Title 1.6C of Part 4 of Division 3 of the Civil Code.

(b) Any employee of an attorney who is not a licensee of the State Bar of California, when communicating with a consumer debtor or with any person other than the debtor concerning a consumer debt, shall identify himself or herself, by whom he or she is employed, and his or her title or job capacity.

(c) Without the prior consent of the debtor given directly to the attorney or his or her employee or the express permission of a court of competent jurisdiction, an attorney or his or her employee shall not communicate with a debtor in connection with the collection of any debt at any unusual time or place, or time or place known, or which should be known, to be inconvenient to the debtor. In the absence of knowledge of circumstances to the contrary, an attorney or his or her employee shall assume that the convenient time for communicating with the debtor is after 8 a.m. and before 9 p.m., local time at the consumer’s location.
